California statutes. Water Code
(b) Such rights may be assigned notwithstanding the fact that no contract pursuant to the provisions of Section 12052 has, at the time of assignment of rights to accrue thereunder, been executed, the provisions of Section 1045 of the Civil Code or of any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding. The department may require, as a condition precedent to its duty to perform any obligation incurred by virtue of its entry into any contract pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12054, the subsequent execution of any contract to be entered into by the department pursuant to Section 12052 which is to create the rights assigned.

(c) The department is authorized to require such assurances from public agencies, in the form of covenants in contracts to which it is a party under the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 12054, as are in the judgment of the department necessary and proper to the execution of the intent expressed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12056.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every public agency empowered by law to make water available for any beneficial use of lands or inhabitants is hereby granted, in addition to and not in derogation or limitation of the powers conferred upon the public agency by any other law, the power:

(a) To enter into a contract with the department, subject to the provisions of Section 12057, for a water supply from the Washoe Project, or from any division or unit thereof, on behalf of the entire public agency, or of any portion or portions thereof for which the law applicable to the agency authorizes an indebtedness or liability to be incurred, including any improvement district, distribution district, or zone existing or hereafter established pursuant to the provisions of the law under which the public agency was formed, or pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (e) of this section, within said public agency, notwithstanding any debt limitation or other provision in the law applicable to such agency which might otherwise preclude or limit the incurring of such indebtedness or liability.

(b) To comply with the provisions of any contract entered into with the department under this part, including any provision which obligates the public agency, or any specified portion or portions thereof, to meet all commitments, financial or otherwise, undertaken by the public agency in such contract, notwithstanding any individual default by its constituents or others in the payment to the public agency of taxes, assessments, tolls, or other charges levied by the public agency.

(c) To annually levy or cause to be levied upon all property in the public agency, or in any portion or portions thereof, subject to taxation or assessment by the public agency an ad valorem tax or assessment, based upon the assessed valuation of such property, necessary and sufficient to meet all commitments, financial or otherwise, of the public agency that are set forth in any contract which the agency enters into with the department under this part, in addition to any other taxes or assessments which the public agency is authorized to levy or cause to be levied on such property and notwithstanding any provision in the law applicable to such agency which might otherwise preclude or limit such taxing or assessing. Where the law applicable to such public agency does not set forth a procedure for levying and collecting taxes or assessments on an ad valorem basis, such public agency shall utilize the procedure for levying and collecting taxes for the payment of principal and interest on general obligation bonds of municipal water districts, set forth in the Municipal Water District Law of 1911 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 70000) of this code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, for the purpose of levying and collecting taxes or assessments necessary and sufficient to meet commitments in a contract entered into under this part.

(d) To make charges for the furnishing of services in connection with the exercise of rights acquired under its contract with the department and to pledge and use any or all revenues received from the collection of such charges for the purpose of meeting the commitments, financial or otherwise, of the public agency that are set forth in any contract which the public agency enters into with the department under this part.

(e) To establish, by resolutions of the governing board thereof adopted from time to time, after notice and hearing thereon, zones of benefit within said public agency without reference to the boundaries of other zones, setting forth in such resolutions descriptions thereof by metes and bounds and entitle each of such zones by zone number. The governing board may, by resolution, after notice and hearing thereon, amend the boundaries by annexing property to or by withdrawing property from said zones or may divide existing zones into two or more zones or may superimpose a new or amended zone or zones already in existence, setting forth in such resolutions descriptions of the amended, divided or superimposed zones by metes and bounds and entitle each of such zones by zone number; provided, that no such amendment, division, or superimposition shall impair the obligations of existing zones undertaken pursuant to the provisions of this part.

The assumption of any indebtedness which the public agency is authorized to incur may be by the entire public agency, or may be by a zone or zones thereof if less than the entire public agency will be benefited by the purpose for which such indebtedness is incurred. In the latter event any election required to authorize the indebtedness shall be held only within the affected zone or zones.

(f) To perform all acts and do all things that are necessary or convenient to carry out the above powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

12057.

(a) Before a public agency may enter into a contract with the department for a water supply from the Washoe Project, or from any division or unit thereof, the public agency shall hold an election on the proposition of whether or not the public agency shall enter into the proposed contract and more than 50 percent of the votes cast at the election must be in favor of the proposition. If a higher percentage of favorable votes is required by the California Constitution before the public agency may incur indebtedness, the higher percentage shall apply in lieu of the percentage set forth in this subdivision. The election shall be held in accordance
 with the following provisions:

(1) The procedure for holding an election on the incurring of bonded indebtedness by a public agency shall be utilized for an election on the proposed contract as nearly as the same may be applicable. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not contain a bond election procedure, the procedure set forth in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, shall be utilized as nearly as the same may be applicable.

(2) No particular form of ballot is required.

(3) The notice of the election shall include a statement of the time and place of the
 election, the purpose of the election, the general purpose of the contract, and the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract.

(4) The ballots for the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of the election. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(5) The election shall be held in the entire public agency except where the public agency proposes to contract with the department on behalf of a specified portion, or of specified portions, of the public agency, in which case the election shall be held in the applicable portion or portions of the public
 agency only.

(b) Every public agency is hereby granted the power to bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the office of
 the public agency is situated to determine the validity of any contract made with the department under this part, and the authority of the public agency to enter into the contract. The action shall be had as in the case of the judicial determination of the validity of the public agency’s bonds, as nearly as the same may be applicable, and with like effect. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not set forth a procedure for the judicial determination of the validity of the public agency’s bonds, the action shall be had as in the case of the judicial determination of the general obligation bonds of irrigation districts under the Irrigation District Law (Division 11 (commencing with Section
 20500)), as it may now or hereafter be amended, as nearly as the same may be applicable, and with like effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 35.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.5. SACRAMENTO-SAN JOAQUIN DELTA [12200. - 12227.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Policy [12200. - 12205.]

12200.

The Legislature hereby finds that the water problems of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta are unique within the State; the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers join at the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta to discharge their fresh water flows into Suisun, San Pablo and San Francisco Bays and thence into the Pacific Ocean; the merging of fresh water with saline bay waters and drainage waters and the withdrawal of fresh water for beneficial uses creates an acute problem of salinity intrusion into the vast network of channels and sloughs of the Delta; the State Water Resources Development System has as one of its objectives the transfer of waters from water-surplus areas in the Sacramento Valley and the north coastal area to water-deficient areas to the south and west of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta via the Delta; water surplus to the needs of the areas in which it originates is gathered in the Delta and thereby provides a common source of fresh water supply for water-deficient areas. It is, therefore, hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable to said Delta and that the enactment of this law is necessary for the protection, conservation, development, control and use of the waters in the Delta for the public good.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

The Legislature finds that the maintenance of an adequate water supply in the Delta sufficient to maintain and expand agriculture, industry, urban, and recreational development in the Delta area as set forth in Section 12220, Chapter 2, of this part, and to provide a common source of fresh water for export to areas of water deficiency is necessary to the peace, health, safety and welfare of the people of the State, except that delivery of such water shall be subject to the provisions of Section 10505 and Sections 11460 to 11463, inclusive, of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

Among the functions to be provided by the State Water Resources Development System, in coordination with the activities of the United States in providing salinity control for the Delta through operation of the Federal Central Valley Project, shall be the provision of salinity control and an adequate water supply for the users of water in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta. If it is determined to be in the public interest to provide a substitute water supply to the users in said Delta in lieu of that which would be provided as a result of salinity control no added financial burden shall be placed upon said Delta water users solely by virtue of such substitution. Delivery of said substitute water supply shall be subject to the provisions of Section 10505 and Sections 11460 to 11463, inclusive, of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State that no person, corporation or public or private agency or the State or the United States should divert water from the channels of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta to which the users within said Delta are entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

In determining the availability of water for export from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta no water shall be exported which is necessary to meet the requirements of Sections 12202 and 12203 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

It is the policy of the State that the operation and management of releases from storage into the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta of water for use outside the area in which such water originates shall be integrated to the maximum extent possible in order to permit the fulfillment of the objectives of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Delta [12220. - 12220.]

12220.

The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta shall include all the lands within the area bounded as follows, and as shown on the attached map prepared by the Department of Water Resources titled “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta,” dated May 26, 1959:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Sacramento-San Joaquin 
 Delta Map appears in the hard-copy publication of the chaptered 
 bill. See Chapter 1766, page 4248, Statutes of 1959. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

Beginning at the Sacramento River at the I Street bridge proceeding westerly along the Southern Pacific Railroad to its intersection with the west levee of the Yolo By-Pass; southerly along the west levee to an intersection with Putah Creek, then westerly along the left bank of Putah Creek to an intersection with the north-south section line dividing sections 29 and 28, T8N, R6E; south along this section line to the northeast corner of section 5, T7N, R3E; west to the northwest corner of said section; south along west boundary of said section to intersection of Reclamation District No. 2068 boundary at northeast corner of SE 14 of section 7, T7N, R3E; southwesterly
 along Reclamation District No. 2068 boundary to southeast corner of SW 14 of section 8, T6N, R2E; west to intersection of Maine Prairie Water Association boundary at southeast corner of SW 14 of section 7, T6N, R2E; along the Maine Prairie Water Association boundary around the northern and western sides to an intersection with the southeast corner of section 6, T5N, R2E; west to the southwest corner of the SE 14 of said section; south to the southwest corner of the NE14 of section 7, T5N, R2E; east to the southeast corner of the NE
 14 of said section; south to the southeast corner of said section; west to the northeast corner of section 13, T5N, R1E; south to the southeast corner of said section; west to the northwest corner of the NE 14 of section 23, T5N, R1E; south to the southwest corner of the NE 14 of said section; west to the northwest corner of the SW 14 of said section; south to the southwest corner of the NW 14 of section 26, T5N, R1E; east to the northeast corner of the SE
 14 of section 25, T5N, R1E; south to the southeast corner of said section; east to the northeast corner of section 31, T5N, R2E; south to the southeast corner of the NE 14 of said section; east to the northeast corner of the SE 14 of section 32, T5N, R2E; south to the northwest corner of section 4, T4N, R2E; east to the northeast corner of said section; south to the southwest corner of the NW 14 of section 3, T4N, R2E; east to the northeast corner of the SE 14 of said section; south to the southwest corner of the
 NW 14 of the NW 14 of section 11, T4N, R2E; east to the southeast corner of the NE 14 of the NE 14 of said section; south along the east line of section 11, T4N, R2E to a road intersection approximately 1000 feet south of the southeast corner of said section; southeasterly along an unnamed road to its intersection with the right bank of the Sacramento River about 0.7 mile upstream from the Rio Vista bridge; southwesterly along the right bank of the Sacramento River to the northern boundary of section 28, T3N, R2E; westerly along the northern boundary of sections 28, 29, and 30, T3N, R2E and sections 25 and
 extended 26, T3N, R1E to the northwest corner of extended section 26, T3N, R1E; northerly along the west boundary of section 23, T3N, R1E to the northwest corner of said section; westerly along the northern boundary of sections 22 and 21, T3N, R1E to the Sacramento Northern Railroad; southerly along the Sacramento Northern Railroad; southerly along the Sacramento Northern Railroad to the ferry slip on Chipps Island; across the Sacramento River to the Mallard Slough pumping plant intake channel of the California Water Service Company; southward along the west bank of the intake channel and along an unnamed creek flowing from Lawler Ravine to the southern boundary of the Contra Costa County Water District; easterly along the southern boundary of the Contra Costa County Water District to the East Contra Costa Irrigation District boundary; southeasterly along the southwestern boundaries of the East Contra Costa Irrigation District, Byron-Bethany Irrigation District, West Side Irrigation District and
 Banta-Carbona Irrigation District to the northeast corner of the NW 14 of section 9, T3S, R6E; east along Linne Road to Kasson Road; southeasterly along Kasson Road to Durham Ferry Road; easterly along Durham Ferry Road to its intersection with the right bank of the San Joaquin River at Reclamation District No. 2064; southeasterly along Reclamation District No. 2064 boundary, around its eastern side to Reclamation District No. 2075 and along the eastern and northern sides of Reclamation District No. 2075 to its intersection with the Durham Ferry Road; north along the Durham Ferry Road to its intersection with Reclamation District No. 17; along the eastern side of Reclamation District No. 17 to French Camp Slough; northerly along French Camp Turnpike to Center Street; north along Center Street to Weber Avenue; east along Weber Avenue to El Dorado Street; north along El Dorado Street to Harding Way; west along
 Harding Way to Pacific Avenue; north along Pacific Avenue to the Calaveras River; easterly along the left bank of the Calaveras River to a point approximately 1,600 feet west of the intersection of the Western Pacific Railroad and the left bank of said river; across the Calaveras River and then north 18° 26′ 36″ west a distance of approximately 2,870 feet; south 72° 50′ west a distance of approximately 4,500 feet to Pacific Avenue (Thornton Road); north along Pacific Avenue continuing onto Thornton Road to its intersection with the boundary line dividing Woodbridge Irrigation District and Reclamation District No. 348; east along this boundary line to its intersection with the Mokelumne River; continuing easterly along the right bank of the Mokelumne River to an intersection with the range line dividing R5E and R6E; north along this range line to the Sacramento-San Joaquin County line; west along the county line to an intersection with Reclamation District No. 1609; northerly along the eastern boundary of
 Reclamation District No. 1609 to the Cosumnes River, upstream along the right bank of the Cosumnes River to an intersection with the eastern boundary of extended section 23, T5N, R5E; north along the eastern boundary of said extended section to the southeast corner of the NE 14 of the NE 14 of said extended section; west to the southeast corner of the NE 14 of the NW 14 of extended section 14, T5N, R5E; west to an intersection with Desmond Road; north along Desmond Road to Wilder-Ferguson Road; west along Wilder-Ferguson Road to the Western Pacific Railroad; north along the Western Pacific Railroad to the
 boundary of the Elk Grove Irrigation District on the southerly boundary of the N 12 of section 4, T5N, R5E; northerly along the western boundary of the Elk Grove Irrigation District to Florin Road; west on Florin Road to the eastern boundary of Reclamation District No. 673; northerly around Reclamation District No. 673 to an intersection with the Sacramento River and then north along the left bank of the Sacramento River to I Street bridge.

Section, range, and township locations are referenced to the Mount Diablo Base Line and Meridian. Road names and locations are as shown on the following United States Geological Survey Quadrangles, 7.5 minute series: Rio Vista, 1953; Clayton, 1953; Vernalis, 1952; Ripon, 1952; Bruceville, 1953; Florin, 1953; and Stockton West, 1952.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1766.   Note: The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Map appears in Ch. 1766 on page 4248 in Vol. 2 of the 1959 Statutes publication.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Levees [12225. - 12227.]



  ARTICLE 1. Plan for Improvement [12225. - 12225.]

12225.

The plan for improvement of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta levees, as set forth in Bulletin No. 192 of the Department of Water Resources, dated May 1975, is approved as a conceptual plan to guide the formulation of projects to preserve the integrity of the delta levee system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1302.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Construction [12226. - 12226.2.]

12226.

The department may prepare detailed plans and specifications for the improvement of the levees or levee segments specified in Section 12225.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1302.)
-------------------------------------------

12226.2.

The department may proceed immediately with the improvement of a pilot levee project which the department determines, after a public hearing, is in critical need of improvement and which is highly susceptible to failure in the absence of such immediate improvement. Prior to commencing such improvement, the department shall enter into an agreement with a local agency whereby the local agency will bear at least 20 percent of the cost of the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1302.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Short Title [12227. - 12227.]

12227.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Nejedly-Mobley Delta Levees Act”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1302.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.6. SAN JOAQUIN RIVER [12230. - 12233.]

12230.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a serious problem of water quality exists in the San Joaquin River between the junction of the San Joaquin River and the Merced River and the junction of the San Joaquin River with Middle River; that by virtue of the nature and causes of the problem and its effect upon water supplies in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, it is a matter of statewide interest and is the responsibility of the State to determine an equitable and feasible solution to this problem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

12231.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State that no person, corporation or public or private agency or the State or the United States should divert water from the San Joaquin River and its tributaries to which the users along the portion of the San Joaquin River described in Section 12230 are entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

12232.

The State Water Resources Control Board, the State Department of Water Resources, the California Water Commission, and any other agency of the state having jurisdiction, shall do nothing, in connection with their responsibilities, to cause further significant degradation of the quality of water in that portion of the San Joaquin River between the points specified in Section 12230.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

12233.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as affecting the quality of water diverted into the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta from the Sacramento River, nor as affecting any vested right to the use of water, regardless of origin, or any water project for which an application to appropriate water was filed with the State Water Resources Control Board prior to June 17, 1961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.7. SPECIAL PROJECTS [12250. - 12255.]



  CHAPTER 1. Feather River Recreation [12250. - 12255.]

12250.

The department is authorized to construct a recreation project in the vicinity of the City of Oroville along the Feather River. Recreation projects which may be considered, in accordance with the project environmental impact report, include, but are not limited to: a swimming area or facility near Bedrock Park, including sanitary and convenience facilities and channel modification, renovation of salmon-spawning riffles in conjunction with a swimming facility, and development of a parkway project and wildlife area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

In order to construct the recreation project authorized pursuant to Section 12250, the department may exercise any of the powers conferred upon it by the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 11100) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

Construction of the recreation project authorized pursuant to Section 12250 shall be contingent upon a favorable environmental impact determination, and upon the execution of an agreement with a local public agency under which such public agency agrees to fund any construction costs exceeding one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000), and agrees to pay all costs of maintaining the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

12255.

Any land acquisition for the purposes of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.8. DELTA FLOOD PROTECTION [12300. - 12318.]



  CHAPTER 1. Delta Flood Protection Fund [12300. - 12303.]

12300.

(a) The Delta Flood Protection Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. There shall be deposited in the fund all moneys appropriated to the fund, including authorized proceeds from the sale of bonds, and all income derived from the investment of moneys that are in the fund.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate, in accordance with Section 12938, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) each year through fiscal year 1998–99 to the Delta Flood Protection Fund from moneys deposited in the California Water Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code. It is further the intent of the Legislature to appropriate annually moneys in the Delta Flood Protection Fund to the department for expenditure and allocation, without regard to fiscal years, in the following amounts and for the following purposes:

(1) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) annually for local assistance under the delta levee maintenance subventions program pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980), and for the administration thereof.

(2) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) annually for special delta flood protection projects under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) and subsidence studies and monitoring, and the administration thereof. These funds shall only be allocated for projects on Bethel, Bradford, Holland, Hotchkiss, Jersey, Sherman, Twitchell, and Webb Islands, and at other locations in the delta and for the Towns of Thornton and Walnut Grove and for approximately 12 miles of levees on islands bordering the Northern Suisun Bay from Van Sickle Island westerly to Montezuma Slough.

(3) Additional moneys as they may become available from proceeds from the sale of bonds issued by the state.

(c) Any moneys unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the Delta Flood Protection Fund and shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for the purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent consistent with Sections 12314, 12987, and 78543, projects funded under subdivision (b) shall be consistent with the delta ecosystem restoration strategy of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

The Delta Flood Protection Fund is hereby abolished on July 1, 2010, and all unencumbered moneys in the fund are transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 548, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 12929.12, if twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) or any lesser amount is transferred pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937 to the California Water Fund from the California Water Resources Development Bond Fund in each of the fiscal years 1990–91 to 1997–98, inclusive, and if six million dollars ($6,000,000) or any lesser amount is so transferred in the 1998–99 fiscal year, that amount shall be appropriated to the Delta Flood Protection Fund for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12300, in lieu of the funds deposited in the California Water Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code. However, that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, may accelerate payments to the California Water Fund for reappropriation to the Delta Flood Protection Fund if the director deems it appropriate to do so.

(b) The obligation of the State Water Resources Development System to reimburse the California Water Fund, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937, shall decrease by amounts equal to the amounts which are transferred from the California Water Resources Development Bond Fund to the California Water Fund and appropriated to the Delta Flood Protection Fund pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For any fiscal year, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Director of Water Resources, may recommend in the Budget Act a source of funding for the Delta Flood Protection Fund which is different from that set forth in subdivision (a). If the Legislature approves the alternative source of funding, the portion of the State Water Resources Development System obligation specified in subdivision (b) which remains outstanding because of the selection of the alternative funding source shall be discharged pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11913.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, upon the creation of the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount pursuant to Section 78540, as proposed to be added by S.B. 900 of the 1995–96 Regular Session, that subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall not apply to the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount and that the funds of the subaccount shall be available to fund equally both of the following:

(1) The delta levee maintenance subventions program pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980), associated mitigation and habitat improvement programs, and the administration thereof.

(2) The special delta flood protection projects pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310), associated mitigation and habitat improvement programs, and the administration thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Environmental Mitigation and Protection Requirements [12306. - 12307.]

12306.

This chapter applies to special flood control projects subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) and to the payment of delta levee subventions under Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1140, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.5.

The Resources Agency shall supervise the implementation of the programs subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1140, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

(a) The Resources Agency, the department, the Reclamation Board, and the Department of Fish and Game shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to coordinate the implementation of the programs subject to this chapter. 

(b) The memorandum of understanding shall provide that the Department of Fish and Game shall enforce any mitigation requirements involving programs subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1140, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Special Flood Control Projects [12310. - 12318.]

12310.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Local public agency” means a reclamation district or levee district or other public agency responsible for the maintenance of a nonproject levee as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 12980 or a project levee as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 12980.

(b) “Project” means the flood control improvement and any mitigation and habitat improvement constructed, or interests in land acquired, for those purposes pursuant to this part.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(d) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as described in Section 12220.

(e) “Net long-term habitat improvement” means enhancement of riparian, fisheries, and wildlife habitat.

(f) “CALFED Bay Delta Program” or “CALFED program” means the program established in May 1995 as a joint effort among state and federal agencies with management and regulatory responsibilities in the San Francisco Bay and Sacramento-San Joaquin River Delta to develop long-term solutions to resource management problems involving the bay-delta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 4.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a program of flood control projects on Bethel, Bradford, Holland, Hotchkiss, Jersey, Sherman, Twitchell, and Webb Islands, and at other locations in the delta and for the Towns of Thornton and Walnut Grove, and for approximately 12 miles of levees on islands bordering Northern Suisun Bay from Van Sickle Island westerly to Montezuma Slough. This program shall have, as its primary purpose, the protection of discrete and identifiable public benefits, including the protection of public highways and roads, utility lines and conduits, and other public facilities, and the protection of urbanized areas, water quality, recreation, navigation, and fish and wildlife habitats, and other public benefits. The program shall also include net long-term habitat improvement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall develop and recommend a plan of action, including alternatives, for flood control for the Towns of Thornton and Walnut Grove and shall submit the plan to the Legislature by January 1, 1989. The department shall not allocate any funds for implementation of the plan of action for flood control for the Towns of Thornton and Walnut Grove until a plan is approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

The department may expend any moneys available to it pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12300 or any moneys available from other sources of funding appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this part. In addition, the department shall seek a sharing of costs with the beneficiaries or owners or operators of the public facilities benefited by the flood protection projects. The department shall also seek cost sharing with, or financial assistance from, federal agencies which have programs applicable to, or which have an interest in, the flood protection projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12313.

(a) The department shall develop a list of areas where flood control work is needed to protect public facilities or provide public benefits. In developing the list, the department shall consult with all appropriate federal, state, and local agencies. The list shall establish a priority for the areas based upon both of the following:

(1) The importance or degree of public benefit needing protection.

(2) The need for flood protective work.

(b) The list shall be submitted to the California Water Commission for approval, and shall be updated by the department, with the approval of the California Water Commission, as the department may deem appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

(a) Guided by the approved priority list developed pursuant to Section 12313, the department shall develop project plans to accomplish the needed flood protection work in cooperation with the local public agency, the public beneficiary, and the Department of Fish and Game.

(b) The plans shall be subject to the approval of the appropriate local public agency or agencies and subject to any cost-sharing agreement the department may have entered into under Section 12312. Project plans may include, or be a combination of, the improvement, rehabilitation, or modification of existing levees, and the conveyance of interests in land to limit or to modify land management practices which have a negative impact on flood control facilities.

(c) Project plans shall include provision for the protection of fish and wildlife habitat determined to be necessary by the Department of Fish and Game and not injurious to the integrity of flood control works. The Department of Fish and Game shall consider the value of the riparian and fisheries habitat and the need to provide greater flood protection in preparing its requirements, and shall not approve any plan which calls for the use of channel islands or berms with significant riparian communities as borrow sites for levee repair materials, unless fully mitigated, or any plans that will result in a net long-term loss of riparian, fisheries, or wildlife habitat.

(d) After the memorandum of understanding required pursuant to Section 12307 is amended as required by Section 78543, the Department of Fish and Game shall also make a written determination as part of its review and approval of a plan or project pursuant to this section and Section 12987 that the proposed expenditures are consistent with a net long-term habitat improvement program and have a net benefit for aquatic species in the delta. The memorandum of understanding in effect prior to the amendments required by Section 78543 shall remain in effect with regard to levee projects and plans until the memorandum of understanding is amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.
